Massachusetts, session 194th, S2630.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
2 new section:-
3 Section 2GGGGGG. Artificial Intelligence Innovation Trust Fund
4 (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
5 fund to be known as the Massachusetts Artificial Intelligence Innovation Trust Fund. The
6 secretary of economic development shall be the trustee of the fund and shall, in consultation with
7 the executive director of the Massachusetts Technology Park Corporation established pursuant to
8 chapter 40J, expend money from the fund to: (i) provide grants or other financial assistance to
9 companies developing or deploying artificial intelligence models in key industry sectors as
10 enumerated in line 7002-8070 of section 2 of chapter 238 of the Acts of 2024; provided,
11 however, that the secretary may seek the commitment of matching or other additional funds from
12 private sources before making an expenditure from the fund; (ii) establishment or promotion of
13 artificial intelligence entrepreneurship programs, which may include partnerships with research
1 of 23

14 institutions in the commonwealth or other entrepreneur support organizations; or (iii) provide
15 grants or other financial assistance for research in artificial intelligence through or in partnership
16 with the Massachusetts Technology Park Corporation.
17 (b) There shall be credited to the fund an amount equal to: (i) any appropriations or other
18 money authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii)
19 interest earned on any money in the fund; and (iii) any other grants, premiums, gifts,
20 reimbursements or other contributions received by the commonwealth from any source for or in
21 support of the purposes described in subsection (a).
22 (c) Amounts credited to the fund may be expended without further appropriation. For the
23 purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and related
24 expenditures, the fund may incur expenses, and the comptroller shall certify for payment,
25 amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimate as certified by the secretary of elder
26 affairs, as reported in the state accounting system. Any money remaining in the fund at the end
27 of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in a
28 subsequent fiscal year.
29 SECTION 2. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the
30 following new chapter:-
31 CHAPTER 93M. Transparency in Frontier Artificial Intelligence Act
32 Section 1.
33 For purposes of this chapter:
2 of 23

34 (a) “Affiliate” means a person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with a
35 specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.
36 (b) “Artificial intelligence model” means an engineered or machine-based system that
37 varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the
38 input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
39 (c) (1) “Catastrophic risk” means a foreseeable and material risk that a frontier
40 developer’s development, storage, use, or deployment of a frontier model will materially
41 contribute to the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more than one billion
42 dollars ($1,000,000,000) in damage to, or loss of, property arising from a single incident
43 involving a frontier model doing any of the following:
44 (A) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation or release of a chemical, biological,
45 radiological, or nuclear weapon.
46 (B) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight, intervention, or
47 supervision that is either a cyberattack or, if the conduct had been committed by a human, would
48 constitute the crime of murder, assault, extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense.
49 (C) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user.
50 (2) “Catastrophic risk” does not include a foreseeable and material risk from any of the
51 following:
52 (A) Information that a frontier model outputs if the information is otherwise publicly
53 accessible in a substantially similar form from a source other than a foundation model.
54 (B) Lawful activity of the federal government.
3 of 23

55 (C) Harm caused by a frontier model in combination with other software if the frontier
56 model did not materially contribute to the harm.
57 (d) “Critical safety incident” means any of the following:
58 (1) Unauthorized access to, modification of, or exfiltration of, the model weights of a
59 frontier model that results in death or bodily injury.
60 (2) Harm resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk.
61 (3) Loss of control of a frontier model causing death or bodily injury.
62 (4) A frontier model that uses deceptive techniques against the frontier developer to
63 subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside of the context of an evaluation
64 designed to elicit this behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased
65 catastrophic risk.
66 (e) (1) “Deploy” means to make a frontier model available to a third party for use,
67 modification, copying, or combination with other software.
68 (2) “Deploy” does not include making a frontier model available to a third party for the
69 primary purpose of developing or evaluating the frontier model.
70 (f) “Foundation model” means an artificial intelligence model that is all of the following:
71 (1) Trained on a broad data set.
72 (2) Designed for generality of output.
73 (3) Adaptable to a wide range of distinctive tasks.
4 of 23

74 (g) “Frontier AI framework” means documented technical and organizational protocols to
75 manage, assess, and mitigate catastrophic risks.
76 (h) “Frontier developer” means a person who has trained, or initiated the training of, a
77 frontier model, with respect to which the person has used, or intends to use, at least as much
78 computing power to train the frontier model as would meet the technical specifications found in
79 subdivision (i).
80 (i) (1) “Frontier model” means a foundation model that was trained using a quantity of
81 computing power greater than 10^26 integer or floating-point operations.
82 (2) The quantity of computing power described in paragraph (1) shall include computing
83 for the original training run and for any subsequent fine-tuning, reinforcement learning, or other
84 material modifications the developer applies to a preceding foundation model.
85 (j) “Large frontier developer” means a frontier developer that together with its affiliates
86 collectively had annual gross revenues in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000)
87 in the preceding calendar year.
88 (k) “Model weight” means a numerical parameter in a frontier model that is adjusted
89 through training and that helps determine how inputs are transformed into outputs.
90 (l) “Property” means tangible or intangible property.
91 Section 2.
92 (a) A large frontier developer shall write, implement, comply with, and clearly and
93 conspicuously publish on its internet website a frontier AI framework that applies to the large
5 of 23

94 frontier developer’s frontier models and describes how the large frontier developer approaches
95 all of the following:
96 (1) Incorporating national standards, international standards, and industry-consensus best
97 practices into its frontier AI framework.
98 (2) Defining and assessing thresholds used by the large frontier developer to identify and
99 assess whether a frontier model has capabilities that could pose a catastrophic risk, which may
100 include multiple-tiered thresholds.
101 (3) Applying mitigations to address the potential for catastrophic risks based on the
102 results of assessments undertaken pursuant to paragraph (2).
103 (4) Reviewing assessments and adequacy of mitigations as part of the decision to deploy
104 a frontier model or use it extensively internally.
105 (5) Using third parties to assess the potential for catastrophic risks and the effectiveness
106 of mitigations of catastrophic risks.
107 (6) Revisiting and updating the frontier AI framework, including any criteria that trigger
108 updates and how the large frontier developer determines when its frontier models are
109 substantially modified enough to require disclosures pursuant to subdivision (c).
110 (7) Cybersecurity practices to secure unreleased model weights from unauthorized
111 modification or transfer by internal or external parties.
112 (8) Identifying and responding to critical safety incidents.
113 (9) Instituting internal governance practices to ensure implementation of these processes.
6 of 23

114 (10) Assessing and managing catastrophic risk resulting from the internal use of its
115 frontier models, including risks resulting from a frontier model circumventing oversight
116 mechanisms.
117 (b) (1) A large frontier developer shall review and, as appropriate, update its frontier AI
118 framework at least once per year.
119 (2) If a large frontier developer makes a material modification to its frontier AI
120 framework, the large frontier developer shall clearly and conspicuously publish the modified
121 frontier AI framework and a justification for that modification within 30 days.
122 (c) (1) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier model or a substantially
123 modified version of an existing frontier model, a frontier developer shall clearly and
124 conspicuously publish on its internet website a transparency report containing all of the
125 following:
126 (A) The internet website of the frontier developer.
127 (B) A mechanism that enables a natural person to communicate with the frontier
128 developer.
129 (C) The release date of the frontier model.
130 (D) The languages supported by the frontier model.
131 (E) The modalities of output supported by the frontier model.
132 (F) The intended uses of the frontier model.
133 (G) Any generally applicable restrictions or conditions on uses of the frontier model.
7 of 23

134 (2) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier model or a substantially
135 modified version of an existing frontier model, a large frontier developer shall include in the
136 transparency report required by paragraph (1) summaries of all of the following:
137 (A) Assessments of catastrophic risks from the frontier model conducted pursuant to the
138 large frontier developer’s frontier AI framework.
139 (B) The results of those assessments.
140 (C) The extent to which third-party evaluators were involved.
141 (D) Other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of the frontier AI framework with respect
142 to the frontier model.
143 (3) A frontier developer that publishes the information described in paragraph (1) or (2)
144 as part of a larger document, including a system card or model card, shall be deemed in
145 compliance with the applicable paragraph.
146 (4) A frontier developer is encouraged, but not required, to make disclosures described in
147 this subdivision that are consistent with, or superior to, industry best practices.
148 (d) A large frontier developer shall transmit to the attorney general a summary of any
149 assessment of catastrophic risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models every three
150 months or pursuant to another reasonable schedule specified by the large frontier developer and
151 communicated in writing to the attorney general with written updates, as appropriate.
152 (e) (1) (A) A frontier developer shall not make a materially false or misleading statement
153 about catastrophic risk from its frontier models or its management of catastrophic risk.
8 of 23

154 (B) A large frontier developer shall not make a materially false or misleading statement
155 about its implementation of, or compliance with, its frontier AI framework.
156 (2) This subdivision does not apply to a statement that was made in good faith and was
157 reasonable under the circumstances.
158 (f) (1) When a frontier developer publishes documents to comply with this section, the
159 frontier developer may make redactions to those documents that are necessary to protect the
160 frontier developer’s trade secrets, the frontier developer’s cybersecurity, public safety, or the
161 national security of the United States or to comply with any federal or state law.
162 (2) If a frontier developer redacts information in a document pursuant to this subdivision,
163 the frontier developer shall describe the character and justification of the redaction in any
164 published version of the document to the extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction
165 and shall retain the unredacted information for five years.
166 (a) The attorney general shall establish a mechanism to be used by a frontier developer or
167 a member of the public to report a critical safety incident that includes all of the following:
168 (1) The date of the critical safety incident.
169 (2) The reasons the incident qualifies as a critical safety incident.
170 (3) A short and plain statement describing the critical safety incident.
171 (4) Whether the incident was associated with internal use of a frontier model.
9 of 23

172 (b) (1) The attorney general shall establish a mechanism to be used by a large frontier
173 developer to confidentially submit summaries of any assessments of the potential for catastrophic
174 risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models.
175 (2) The attorney general shall take all necessary precautions to limit access to any reports
176 related to internal use of frontier models to only personnel with a specific need to know the
177 information and to protect the reports from unauthorized access.
178 (c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a frontier developer shall report any critical safety
179 incident pertaining to one or more of its frontier models to the attorney general within 15 days of
180 discovering the critical safety incident.
181 (2) If a frontier developer discovers that a critical safety incident poses an imminent risk
182 of death or serious physical injury, the frontier developer shall disclose that incident within 24
183 hours to an authority, including any law enforcement agency or public safety agency with
184 jurisdiction, that is appropriate based on the nature of that incident and as required by law.
185 (3) A frontier developer that discovers information about a critical safety incident after
186 filing the initial report required by this subdivision may file an amended report.
187 (4) A frontier developer is encouraged, but not required, to report critical safety incidents
188 pertaining to foundation models that are not frontier models.
189 (d) The attorney general shall review critical safety incident reports submitted by frontier
190 developers and may review reports submitted by members of the public.
10 of 23

191 (e) (1) The attorney general may transmit reports of critical safety incidents and reports
192 from covered employees to the Legislature, the Governor, the federal government, or appropriate
193 state agencies.
194 (2) The Attorney General shall strongly consider any risks related to trade secrets, public
195 safety, cybersecurity of a frontier developer, or national security when transmitting reports.
196 (f) A report of a critical safety incident submitted to the attorney general pursuant to this
197 section, a report of assessments of catastrophic risk from internal use, and a covered employee
198 report are exempt from chapter 66.
199 (g) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the attorney general shall
200 produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about critical safety incidents that
201 have been reviewed by the attorney general since the preceding report.
202 (2) The attorney general shall not include information in a report pursuant to this
203 subdivision that would compromise the trade secrets or cybersecurity of a frontier developer,
204 public safety, or the national security of the United States or that would be prohibited by any
205 federal or state law.
206 (3) The attorney general shall transmit a report pursuant to this subdivision to the
207 Legislature and to the Governor.
208 (h) The attorney general may adopt regulations designating one or more federal laws,
209 regulations, or guidance documents that meet all of the following conditions for the purposes of
210 subdivision (i):
11 of 23

211 (1) (A) The law, regulation, or guidance document imposes or states standards or
212 requirements for critical safety incident reporting that are substantially equivalent to, or stricter
213 than, those required by this section.
214 (B) The law, regulation, or guidance document described in subparagraph (A) does not
215 need to require critical safety incident reporting to the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
216 (2) The law, regulation, or guidance document is intended to assess, detect, or mitigate
217 the catastrophic risk.
218 (i) (1) A frontier developer that intends to comply with this section by complying with
219 the requirements of, or meeting the standards stated by, a federal law, regulation, or guidance
220 document designated pursuant to subdivision (h) shall declare its intent to do so to the attorney
221 general.
222 (2) After a frontier developer has declared its intent pursuant to paragraph (1), both of the
223 following apply:
224 (A) The frontier developer shall be deemed in compliance with this section to the extent
225 that the frontier developer meets the standards of, or complies with the requirements imposed or
226 stated by, the designated federal law, regulation, or guidance document until the frontier
227 developer declares the revocation of that intent to the attorney general or the attorney general
228 revokes a relevant regulation pursuant to subdivision (j).
229 (B) The failure by a frontier developer to meet the standards of, or comply with the
230 requirements stated by, the federal law, regulation, or guidance document designated pursuant to
231 subdivision (h) shall constitute a violation of this chapter.
12 of 23

232 (j) The attorney general shall revoke a regulation adopted under subdivision (h) if the
233 requirements of subdivision (h) are no longer met.
234 Section 3.
235 (a) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the attorney general, in
236 consultation with MassCompute, shall assess recent evidence and developments relevant to the
237 purposes of this chapter and shall make recommendations about whether and how to update any
238 of the following definitions for the purposes of this chapter to ensure that they accurately reflect
239 technological developments, scientific literature, and widely accepted national and international
240 standards:
241 (1) “Frontier model” so that it applies to foundation models at the frontier of artificial
242 intelligence development.
243 (2) “Frontier developer” so that it applies to developers of frontier models who are
244 themselves at the frontier of artificial intelligence development.
245 (3) “Large frontier developer” so that it applies to well-resourced frontier developers.
246 (b) In making recommendations pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall take
247 into account all of the following:
248 (1) Similar thresholds used in international standards or federal law, guidance, or
249 regulations for the management of catastrophic risk and shall align with a definition adopted in a
250 federal law or regulation to the extent that it is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
251 (2) Input from stakeholders, including academics, industry, the open-source community,
252 and governmental entities.
13 of 23

253 (3) The extent to which a person will be able to determine, before beginning to train or
254 deploy a foundation model, whether that person will be subject to the definition as a frontier
255 developer or as a large frontier developer with an aim toward allowing earlier determinations if
256 possible.
257 (4) The complexity of determining whether a person or foundation model is covered, with
258 an aim toward allowing simpler determinations if possible.
259 (5) The external verifiability of determining whether a person or foundation model is
260 covered, with an aim toward definitions that are verifiable by parties other than the frontier
261 developer.
262 (c) Upon developing recommendations pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall
263 submit a report to the Legislature with those recommendations.
264 (d) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the attorney general shall
265 produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about reports from covered
266 employees that have been reviewed by the attorney general since the preceding report.
267 (2) The attorney general shall not include information in a report pursuant to this
268 subdivision that would compromise the trade secrets or cybersecurity of a frontier developer,
269 confidentiality of a covered employee, public safety, or the national security of the United States
270 or that would be prohibited by any federal or state law.
271 (3) The attorney general shall transmit a report pursuant to this subdivision to the
272 Legislature and to the Governor.
273 Section 4.
14 of 23

274 (a) A large frontier developer that fails to publish or transmit a compliant document
275 required to be published or transmitted under this chapter, makes a statement in violation of this
276 chapter, fails to report an incident as required by this chapter, or fails to comply with its own
277 frontier AI framework shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount dependent upon the
278 severity of the violation that does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per violation.
279 (b) A civil penalty described in this section shall be recovered in a civil action brought
280 only by the Attorney General.
281 Section 5.
282 The loss of value of equity does not count as damage to or loss of property for the
283 purposes of this chapter.
284 Section 6.
285 (a) There is hereby established within the Executive Office of Technology Services and
286 Security a consortium that shall develop, pursuant to this section, a framework for the creation of
287 a public cloud computing cluster to be known as “MassCompute.”
288 (b) The consortium shall develop a framework for the creation of MassCompute that
289 advances the development and deployment of artificial intelligence that is safe, ethical, equitable,
290 and sustainable by doing, at a minimum, both of the following:
291 (1) Fostering research and innovation that benefits the public.
292 (2) Enabling equitable innovation by expanding access to computational resources.
15 of 23

293 (c) The consortium shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that MassCompute is
294 established within public institutions of higher education to the extent possible.
295 (d) MassCompute shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
296 (1) A fully owned and hosted cloud platform.
297 (2) Necessary human expertise to operate and maintain the platform.
298 (3) Necessary human expertise to support, train, and facilitate the use of MassCompute.
299 (e) The consortium shall operate in accordance with all relevant labor and workforce laws
300 and standards.
301 (f) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, MassCompute shall submit
302 a report from the consortium to the Legislature with the framework, and any updates to said
303 framework, developed pursuant to subdivision (b) for the creation and operation of
304 MassCompute.
305 (2) The report required by this subdivision shall include all of the following elements:
306 (A) A landscape analysis of Massachusetts' current public, private, and nonprofit cloud
307 computing platform infrastructure.
308 (B) An analysis of the cost to the state to build and maintain MassCompute and
309 recommendations for potential funding sources.
310 (C) Recommendations for the governance structure and ongoing operation of
311 MassCompute.
16 of 23

312 (D) Recommendations for the parameters for use of MassCompute, including, but not
313 limited to, a process for determining which users and projects will be supported by
314 MassCompute.
315 (E) An analysis of the state’s technology workforce and recommendations for equitable
316 pathways to strengthen the workforce, including the role of MassCompute.
317 (F) A detailed description of any proposed partnerships, contracts, or licensing
318 agreements with nongovernmental entities, including, but not limited to, technology-based
319 companies, that demonstrates compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d).
320 (G) Recommendations regarding how the creation and ongoing management of
321 MassCompute can prioritize the use of the current public sector workforce.
322 (g) The consortium shall consist of 14 members as follows:
323 (1) Four representatives of public and private academic research institutions and national
324 laboratories appointed by the Governor.
325 (2) Three representatives of impacted workforce labor organizations appointed by the as
326 appointed by Senate President, Speaker of the House of Representatives and Governor,
327 respectively.
328 (3) Three representatives of stakeholder groups with relevant expertise and experience,
329 including, but not limited to, ethicists, consumer rights advocates, and other public interest
330 advocates appointed by Senate President, Speaker of the House of Representatives and
331 Governor, respectively.
17 of 23

332 (4) Four experts in technology and artificial intelligence to provide technical assistance
333 appointed by the Governor.
334 (h) The members of the consortium shall serve without compensation, but shall be
335 reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.
336 (i) If MassCompute is established within public institutions of higher education, said
337 public institutions of higher education may receive private donations for the purposes of
338 implementing MassCompute.
339 (k) This section shall be subject to appropriation.
340 Section 7.
341 (a) (1) “Catastrophic risk” means a foreseeable and material risk that a frontier
342 developer’s development, storage, use, or deployment of a foundation model will materially
343 contribute to the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more than one billion
344 dollars ($1,000,000,000) in damage to, or loss of, property arising from a single incident
345 involving a foundation model doing any of the following:
346 (A) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation or release of a chemical, biological,
347 radiological, or nuclear weapon.
348 (B) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight, intervention, or
349 supervision that is either a cyberattack or, if committed by a human, would constitute the crime
350 of murder, assault, extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense.
351 (C) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user.
18 of 23

352 (2) “Catastrophic risk” does not include a foreseeable and material risk from any of the
353 following:
354 (A) Information that a foundation model outputs if the information is otherwise publicly
355 accessible in a substantially similar form from a source other than a foundation model.
356 (B) Lawful activity of the federal government.
357 (C) Harm caused by a foundation model in combination with other software where the
358 foundation model did not materially contribute to the harm.
359 (b) “Covered employee” means an employee responsible for assessing, managing, or
360 addressing risk of critical safety incidents.
361 (c) “Critical safety incident” means any of the following:
362 (1) Unauthorized access to, modification of, or exfiltration of the model weights of a
363 foundation model that results in death, bodily injury, or damage to, or loss of, property.
364 (2) Harm resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk.
365 (3) Loss of control of a foundation model causing death or bodily injury.
366 (4) A foundation model that uses deceptive techniques against the frontier developer to
367 subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside of the context of an evaluation
368 designed to elicit this behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased
369 catastrophic risk.
370 (a) A frontier developer shall not make, adopt, enforce, or enter into a rule, regulation,
371 policy, or contract that prevents a covered employee from disclosing, or retaliates against a
19 of 23

372 covered employee for disclosing, information to the Attorney General, a federal authority, a
373 person with authority over the covered employee, or another covered employee who has
374 authority to investigate, discover, or correct the reported issue, if the covered employee has
375 reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses either of the following:
376 (1) The frontier developer’s activities pose a specific and substantial danger to the public
377 health or safety resulting from a catastrophic risk.
378 (2) The frontier developer has violated this chapter.
379 (b) A frontier developer shall not enter into a contract that prevents a covered employee
380 from making a disclosure protected under this chapter.
381 (c) A covered employee may use the hotline described in this section to make reports
382 described in subdivision (a).
383 (d) A frontier developer shall provide a clear notice to all covered employees of their
384 rights and responsibilities under this section, including by doing either of the following:
385 (1) At all times posting and displaying within any workplace maintained by the frontier
386 developer a notice to all covered employees of their rights under this section, ensuring that any
387 new covered employee receives equivalent notice, and ensuring that any covered employee who
388 works remotely periodically receives an equivalent notice.
389 (2) At least once each year, providing written notice to each covered employee of the
390 covered employee’s rights under this section and ensuring that the notice is received and
391 acknowledged by all of those covered employees.
20 of 23

392 (e) (1) A large frontier developer shall provide a reasonable internal process through
393 which a covered employee may anonymously disclose information to the large frontier developer
394 if the covered employee believes in good faith that the information indicates that the large
395 frontier developer’s activities present a specific and substantial danger to the public health or
396 safety resulting from a catastrophic risk or that the large frontier developer violated this chapter,
397 including a monthly update to the person who made the disclosure regarding the status of the
398 large frontier developer’s investigation of the disclosure and the actions taken by the large
399 frontier developer in response to the disclosure.
400 (2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the disclosures and responses of the
401 process required by this subdivision shall be shared with officers and directors of the large
402 frontier developer at least once each quarter.
403 (B) If a covered employee has alleged wrongdoing by an officer or director of the large
404 frontier developer in a disclosure or response, subparagraph (A) shall not apply with respect to
405 that officer or director.
406 (f) The court is authorized to award reasonable attorney’s fees to a plaintiff who brings a
407 successful action for a violation of this section.
408 (g) In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, once it has been demonstrated by a
409 preponderance of the evidence that an activity proscribed by this section was a contributing
410 factor in the alleged prohibited action against the covered employee, the frontier developer shall
411 have the burden of proof to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the alleged action
412 would have occurred for legitimate, independent reasons even if the covered employee had not
413 engaged in activities protected by this section.
21 of 23

414 (h) (1) In a civil action or administrative proceeding brought pursuant to this section, a
415 covered employee may petition the superior court in any county wherein the violation in question
416 is alleged to have occurred, or wherein the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate
417 temporary or preliminary injunctive relief.
418 (2) Upon the filing of the petition for injunctive relief, the petitioner shall cause notice
419 thereof to be served upon the person, and thereupon the court shall have jurisdiction to grant
420 temporary injunctive relief as the court deems just and proper.
421 (3) In addition to any harm resulting directly from a violation of this section, the court
422 shall consider the chilling effect on other covered employees asserting their rights under this
423 section in determining whether temporary injunctive relief is just and proper.
424 (4) Appropriate injunctive relief shall be issued on a showing that reasonable cause exists
425 to believe a violation has occurred.
426 (5) An order authorizing temporary injunctive relief shall remain in effect until an
427 administrative or judicial determination or citation has been issued, or until the completion of a
428 review pursuant to this section, whichever is longer, or at a certain time set by the court.
429 Thereafter, a preliminary or permanent injunction may be issued if it is shown to be just and
430 proper. Any temporary injunctive relief shall not prohibit a frontier developer from disciplining
431 or terminating a covered employee for conduct that is unrelated to the claim of the retaliation.
432 (i) Notwithstanding Massachusetts Rules of Civil Procedure, injunctive relief granted
433 pursuant to this section shall not be stayed pending appeal.
434 (j) (1) This section does not impair or limit the applicability of provisions of law.
22 of 23

435 (2) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative to each other and the remedies
436 or penalties available under all other laws of this state.
437 Section 8.
438 The loss of value of equity does not count as damage to or loss of property for the
439 purposes of this chapter.
440 Section 9, The attorney general, in consultation with MassCompute, may promulgate,
441 amend, or rescind regulations for the implementation, administration, and enforcement of this
442 chapter.
23 of 23